District of Columbia statutes.
4-210.06

Hearing involving medical issues.

When the hearing involves medical issues, the medical assessment of the claimant’s condition must be made by a medical authority other than the persons who made the original medical determination if the hearing officer or the claimant considers an additional examination necessary. The additional medical assessment shall be limited to one assessment which shall be obtained at agency expense, and, when requested by the claimant, shall be obtained from a medical source satisfactory to the claimant.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1006, 29 DCR 1060
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-27, § 2(k), 38 DCR 4205
1981 Ed., § 3-210.6.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 101(k) of Omnibus Budget Support Temporary Act of 1991 (D.C. Law 9-19, June 21, 1991, law notification 38 DCR 5786).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 101(k) of the Omnibus Budget Support Emergency Act of 1991 (D.C. Act 9-37, May 17, 1991, 38 DCR 3390).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 101(k) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Recess Emergency Act of 1991 (D.C. Act 9-69, July 24, 1991, 38 DCR 4945).